Arkansas, session 2025, HB1913.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 27-16-701(a)(2), concerning the application
for a driver's license or instruction permit, is amended to read as follows:
(2) The commercial driver's license or noncommercial driver's
license shall include the:
(A) An intermediate driver's license issued to persons who
are less than eighteen (18) years of age; and the
(B) A learner's license issued to persons who are less
than sixteen (16) years of age.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 27-16-704(b)(7), concerning the examination
of an application for a driver's license, is amended to read as follows:
(7) In addition, the applicant for a learner's license and an
intermediate driver's license shall have the student's applicant's driving
record checked to verify that the student applicant has been free of a
*ZRC108*
03/31/2025 11:25:41 AM ZRC108

HB1913
serious accident and conviction of a serious traffic violation for the last
six (6) months and that an applicant with an intermediate driver's license
applying for a regular license has been free of a serious accident and
conviction of a serious traffic violation for the last twelve (12) months.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 27-16-801(a)(1)(A)(ii), concerning the
requirement that the Office of Driver Services issue certain licenses, is
amended to read as follows:
(ii) An intermediate Class D license or an
intermediate Class M license to each applicant between who is sixteen (16)
and eighteen (18) years of age or older, for a period of up to two (2) years,
upon payment of twelve dollars ($12.00);

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 27-16-804(g)(1)(A), concerning the issuance
of intermediate driver's licenses, is amended to read as follows:
(g)(1)(A) The Office of Driver Services shall have authority to issue
to those persons under eighteen (18) who are at least sixteen (16) years of
age a restricted driver's license to be known as an “intermediate driver's
license”.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 27-16-901(a)(1)(B)(ii), concerning the
expiration and renewal of driver's licenses, is amended to read as follows:
(ii) Any person sixteen (16) years of age or older
may apply for an intermediate driver's license, provided that his or her
driving record is free of a serious accident and conviction of a serious
traffic violation for the most recent six-month period.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 27-16-901(a)(1)(C), concerning the
expiration and renewal of driver's licenses, is amended to read as follows:
(C)(i) An intermediate driver's license shall be issued
for no more than a two-year period and shall expire immediately upon the:
(a) The driver's reaching eighteen (18) years
of age, and if:
(1) The intermediate driver has been
free of a serious accident and conviction of a serious traffic violation for
at least twelve (12) months before arriving at his or her eighteenth
03/31/2025 11:25:41 AM ZRC108

HB1913
birthday; and
(2) The intermediate driver's license
was issued to the intermediate driver before his or her eighteenth birthday;
or
(b) If the intermediate driver was eighteen
(18) years of age or older when his or her intermediate driver's license was
issued, the time at which the intermediate driver has been free of a serious
accident and conviction of a serious traffic violation for at least twelve
(12) months.
(ii) An intermediate driver's license may be renewed
at that the time of expiration or within thirty (30) days following the
expiration date of the intermediate driver's license as a:
(a) A regular driver's license for eight (8)
years, so long as the intermediate driver has been free of a serious accident
and conviction of a serious traffic violation for at least twelve (12) months
before arriving at his or her eighteenth birthday if the conditions stated in
subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this section are met; or
(b) An intermediate driver's license for two
(2) years if the conditions stated in subdivision (a)(1)(C)(i) of this
section are not met.
















03/31/2025 11:25:41 AM ZRC108